Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB73.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 161.220 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS 161.220 to 161.716 and 161.990:
(1) "Retirement system" means the arrangement provided for in KRS 161.220 to 161.716 and 161.990 for
payment of allowances to members;
(2) "Retirement allowance" means the amount annually payable during the course of his or her natural life to a
member who has been retired by reason of service;
(3) "Disability allowance" means the amount annually payable to a member retired by reason of disability;
(4) "Member" means the commissioner of education, deputy commissioners, associate commissioners, and all
division directors in the State Department of Education, employees participating in the system pursuant to
KRS 196.167(3)(b)1., and any full-time teacher or professional occupying a position requiring certification or
graduation from a four (4) year college or university, as a condition of employment, and who is employed by
public boards, institutions, or agencies as follows:
(a) Local boards of education and public charter schools if the public charter school satisfies the criteria set
by the Internal Revenue Service to participate in a governmental retirement plan;
(b) Eastern Kentucky University, Kentucky State University, Morehead State University, Murray State
University, Western Kentucky University, and any community colleges established under the control of
these universities;
(c) State-operated secondary area vocational education or area technology centers, Kentucky School for the
Blind, and Kentucky School for the Deaf;
(d) Other public education agencies as created by the General Assembly and those members of the
administrative staff of the Teachers' Retirement System of the State of Kentucky whom the board of
trustees may designate by administrative regulation;
(e) Regional cooperative organizations formed by local boards of education or other public educational
institutions listed in this subsection, for the purpose of providing educational services to the
participating organizations;
(f) All full-time members of the staffs of the Kentucky Association of School Administrators, Kentucky
Education Association, Kentucky Vocational Association, Kentucky High School Athletic Association,
Kentucky Academic Association, and the Kentucky School Boards Association who were members of
the Kentucky Teachers' Retirement System or were qualified for a position covered by the system at the
time of employment by the association in the event that the board of directors of the respective
association petitions to be included. The board of trustees of the Kentucky Teachers' Retirement System
may designate by resolution whether part-time employees of the petitioning association are to be
included. The state shall make no contributions on account of these employees, either full-time or part-
time. The association shall make the employer's contributions, including any contribution that is
specified under KRS 161.550. The provisions of this paragraph shall be applicable to persons in the
employ of the associations on or subsequent to July 1, 1972;
(g) Employees of the Council on Postsecondary Education who were employees of the Department for
Adult Education and Literacy and who were members of the Kentucky Teachers' Retirement System at
the time the department was transferred to the council pursuant to Executive Order 2003-600;
(h) The Office of Career and Technical Education;
(i) The Office of Vocational Rehabilitation;
(j) The Kentucky Educational Collaborative for State Agency Children;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(k) The Governor's Scholars Program;
(l) Any person who is retired for service from the retirement system and is reemployed by an employer
identified in this subsection in a position that the board of trustees deems to be a member, except that
any person who becomes a member on or after January 1, 2022, and subsequently draws a monthly
lifetime retirement allowance, shall upon reemployment after retirement not earn a second retirement
account;
(m) Employees of the former Cabinet for Workforce Development who are transferred to the Kentucky
Community and Technical College System and who occupy positions covered by the Kentucky
Teachers' Retirement System shall remain in the Teachers' Retirement System. New employees
occupying these positions, as well as newly created positions qualifying for Teachers' Retirement
System coverage that would have previously been included in the former Cabinet for Workforce
Development, shall be members of the Teachers' Retirement System;
(n) Effective January 1, 1998, employees of state community colleges who are transferred to the Kentucky
Community and Technical College System shall continue to participate in federal old age, survivors,
disability, and hospital insurance, and a retirement plan other than the Kentucky Teachers' Retirement
System offered by Kentucky Community and Technical College System. New employees occupying
positions in the Kentucky Community and Technical College System as referenced in KRS 164.5807(5)
that would not have previously been included in the former Cabinet for Workforce Development, shall
participate in federal old age, survivors, disability, and hospital insurance and have a choice at the time
of employment of participating in a retirement plan provided by the Kentucky Community and
Technical College System, including participation in the Kentucky Teachers' Retirement System, on the
same basis as faculty of the state universities as provided in KRS 161.540 and 161.620;
(o) Employees of the Office of General Counsel, the Office of Budget and Administrative Services, and the
Office of Quality and Human Resources within the Office of the Secretary of the former Cabinet for
Workforce Development and the commissioners of the former Department for Adult Education and
Literacy and the former Department for Technical Education who were contributing to the Kentucky
Teachers' Retirement System as of July 15, 2000;
(p) Employees of the Kentucky Department of Education only who are graduates of a four (4) year college
or university, notwithstanding a substitution clause within a job classification, and who are serving in a
professional job classification as defined by the department;
(q) The Governor's School for Entrepreneurs Program;
(r) Employees of the Office of Adult Education within the Department of Workforce Development in the
Education and Labor Cabinet who were employees of the Council on Postsecondary Education,
Kentucky Adult Education Program and who were members of the Kentucky Teachers' Retirement
System at the time the Program was transferred to the cabinet pursuant to Executive Orders 2019-0026
and 2019-0027;[ and]
(s) Employees of the Education Professional Standards Board who were members of the Kentucky
Teachers' Retirement System at the time the employees were transferred to the Kentucky Department of
Education pursuant to Executive Order 2020-590; and
(t) WeLeadCS, the virtual computer science career academy established in KRS 158.809;
(5) "Present teacher" means any teacher who was a teacher on or before July 1, 1940, and became a member of the
retirement system created by 1938 (1st Extra. Sess.) Ky. Acts ch. 1, on the date of the inauguration of the
system or within one (1) year after that date, and any teacher who was a member of a local teacher retirement
system in the public elementary or secondary schools of the state on or before July 1, 1940, and continued to
be a member of the system until he or she, with the membership of the local retirement system, became a
member of the state Teachers' Retirement System or who becomes a member under the provisions of KRS
161.470(4);
(6) "New teacher" means any member not a present teacher;
(7) "Prior service" means the number of years during which the member was a teacher in Kentucky prior to July 1,
1941, except that not more than thirty (30) years' prior service shall be allowed or credited to any teacher;
(8) "Subsequent service" means the number of years during which the teacher is a member of the Teachers'
Retirement System after July 1, 1941;

CHAPTER 64 3
(9) "Final average salary" means the average of the five (5) highest annual salaries which the member has received
for service in a covered position and on which the member has made contributions, or on which the public
board, institution, or agency has picked-up member contributions pursuant to KRS 161.540(2), or the average
of the five (5) years of highest salaries as defined in KRS 61.680(2)(a), which shall include picked-up member
contributions. Additionally, the board of trustees may approve a final average salary based upon the average of
the three (3) highest salaries for individuals who become members prior to January 1, 2022, who are at least
fifty-five (55) years of age and have a minimum of twenty-seven (27) years of Kentucky service credit.
However, if any of the five (5) or three (3) highest annual salaries used to calculate the final average salary
was paid within the three (3) years immediately prior to the date of the member's retirement for individuals
who become members prior to January 1, 2022, or within the five (5) years immediately prior to the date of the
member's retirement for individuals who become members on or after January 1, 2022, the amount of salary to
be included for each of those three (3) years or five (5) years, as applicable, for the purpose of calculating the
final average salary shall be limited to the lesser of:
(a) The member's actual salary; or
(b) The member's annual salary that was used for retirement purposes during each of the prior three (3)
years or five (5) years, as applicable, plus a percentage increase equal to the percentage increase
received by all other members employed by the public board, institution, or agency, or for members of
school districts, the highest percentage increase received by members on any one (1) rank and step of
the salary schedule of the school district. The increase shall be computed on the salary that was used for
retirement purposes. The board of trustees may promulgate an administrative regulation in accordance
with KRS Chapter 13A to establish a methodology for measuring the limitation so that the combined
increases in salary for each of the last three (3) full years of salary prior to retirement shall not exceed
the total permissible percentage increase received by other members of the employer for the same three
(3) year period.
For individuals who became members of the retirement system prior to July 1, 2021, this limitation shall not
apply if the member receives an increase in salary in a percentage exceeding that received by the other
members, and this increase was accompanied by a corresponding change in position or in length of
employment. The board of trustees may promulgate an administrative regulation in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13A to provide definitions for a corresponding change in position or in length of employment. This
limitation shall also not apply to the payment to a member for accrued annual leave if the individual becomes a
member before July 1, 2008, or accrued sick leave which is authorized by statute and which shall, for
individuals subject to KRS 161.155(10) who became nonuniversity members of the system prior to January 1,
2022, be included as part of a retiring member's annual compensation for the member's last year of active
service;
(10) "Annual compensation" means the total salary received by a member as compensation for all services
performed in employment covered by the retirement system during a fiscal year. Annual compensation shall
not include payment for any benefit or salary adjustments made by the public board, institution, or agency to
the member or on behalf of the member which is not available as a benefit or salary adjustment to other
members employed by that public board, institution, or agency. Annual compensation shall not include the
salary supplement received by a member under KRS 157.197(2)(c), 158.6455, or 158.782 on or after July 1,
1996. Under no circumstances shall annual compensation include compensation that is earned by a member
while on assignment to an organization or agency that is not a public board, institution, or agency listed in
subsection (4) of this section. In the event that federal law requires that a member continue membership in the
retirement system even though the member is on assignment to an organization or agency that is not a public
board, institution, or agency listed in subsection (4) of this section, the member's annual compensation for
retirement purposes shall be deemed to be the annual compensation, as limited by subsection (9) of this
section, last earned by the member while still employed solely by and providing services directly to a public
board, institution, or agency listed in subsection (4) of this section. The board of trustees shall determine if any
benefit or salary adjustment qualifies as annual compensation. For an individual who becomes a member on or
after July 1, 2008, annual compensation shall not include lump-sum payments upon termination of
employment for accumulated annual or compensatory leave;
(11) "Age of member" means the age attained on the first day of the month immediately following the birthdate of
the member. This definition is limited to retirement eligibility and does not apply to tenure of members;
(12) "Employ," and derivatives thereof, means relationships under which an individual provides services to an
employer as an employee, as an independent contractor, as an employee of a third party, or under any other
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

4 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
arrangement as long as the services provided to the employer are provided in a position that would otherwise
be covered by the Kentucky Teachers' Retirement System and as long as the services are being provided to a
public board, institution, or agency listed in subsection (4) of this section;
(13) "Regular interest" means:
(a) For an individual who becomes a member prior to July 1, 2008, interest at three percent (3%) per
annum;:
(b) For an individual who becomes a member on or after July 1, 2008, but prior to January 1, 2022, interest
at two and one-half percent (2.5%) per annum for purposes of crediting interest to the teacher savings
account or any other contributions made by the employee that are refundable to the employee upon
termination of employment; and
(c) For an individual who becomes a member on or after January 1, 2022, the rolling five (5) year yield on
a thirty (30) year United States Treasury bond as of the end of May prior to the most recently completed
fiscal year, except that:
1. Once the member has at least sixty (60) months of service in the system it shall mean interest at
two and one-half percent (2.5%) per annum for purposes of crediting interest to employee
contributions in the foundational benefit component or any other contributions made by the
employee to the foundational benefit component that are refundable to the employee upon
termination of employment; and
2. The board shall have the authority to adjust the regular interest rate for individuals who become
members on or after January 1, 2022, in accordance with KRS 161.633 and 161.634;
(14) "Accumulated contributions" means the contributions of a member to the teachers' savings fund, including
picked-up member contributions as described in KRS 161.540(2), plus accrued regular interest;
(15) "Annuitant" means a person who receives a retirement allowance or a disability allowance;
(16) "Local retirement system" means any teacher retirement or annuity system created in any public school district
in Kentucky in accordance with the laws of Kentucky;
(17) "Fiscal year" means the twelve (12) month period from July 1 to June 30. The retirement plan year is
concurrent with this fiscal year. A contract for a member employed by a local board of education may not
exceed two hundred sixty-one (261) days in the fiscal year;
(18) "Public schools" means the schools and other institutions mentioned in subsection (4) of this section;
(19) "Dependent" as used in KRS 161.520 and 161.525 means a person who was receiving, at the time of death of
the member, at least one-half (1/2) of the support from the member for maintenance, including board, lodging,
medical care, and related costs;
(20) "Active contributing member" means a member currently making contributions to the Teachers' Retirement
System, who made contributions in the next preceding fiscal year, for whom picked-up member contributions
are currently being made, or for whom these contributions were made in the next preceding fiscal year;
(21) "Full-time" means employment in a position that requires services on a continuing basis equal to at least
seven-tenths (7/10) of normal full-time service on a fiscal year basis;
(22) "Full actuarial cost," when used to determine the payment that a member must pay for service credit means the
actuarial value of all costs associated with the enhancement of a member's benefits or eligibility for benefit
enhancements, including health insurance supplement payments made by the retirement system. The actuary
for the retirement system shall determine the full actuarial value costs and actuarial cost factor tables as
provided in KRS 161.400;
(23) "Last annual compensation" means the annual compensation, as defined by subsection (10) of this section and
as limited by subsection (9) of this section, earned by the member during the most recent period of
contributing service, either consecutive or nonconsecutive, that is sufficient to provide the member with one
(1) full year of service credit in the Kentucky Teachers' Retirement System, and which compensation is used
in calculating the member's initial retirement allowance, excluding bonuses, retirement incentives, payments
for accumulated sick leave, annual, personal, and compensatory leave, and any other lump-sum payment. For
an individual who becomes a member on or after July 1, 2008, payments for annual or compensatory leave
shall not be included in determining the member's last annual compensation;

CHAPTER 64 5
(24) "Participant" means a member, as defined by subsection (4) of this section, or an annuitant, as defined by
subsection (15) of this section;
(25) "Qualified domestic relations order" means any judgment, decree, or order, including approval of a property
settlement agreement, that:
(a) Is issued by a court or administrative agency; and
(b) Relates to the provision of child support, alimony payments, or marital property rights to an alternate
payee;
(26) "Alternate payee" means a spouse, former spouse, child, or other dependent of a participant, who is designated
to be paid retirement benefits in a qualified domestic relations order;
(27) "University member" means an individual who becomes a member through employment with an employer
specified in subsection (4)(b) and (n) of this section;
(28) "Nonuniversity member" means an individual who becomes a member through employment with an employer
specified under subsection (4) of this section, except for those members employed by an employer specified in
subsection (4)(b) and (n) of this section;
(29) "Accumulated employer contribution" means the employer contribution deposited to a member's account
through the supplemental benefit component and regular interest credited on such amounts as provided by
KRS 161.635 for nonuniversity members and KRS 161.636 for university members;
(30) "Accumulated account balance" means:
(a) For members who began participating in the system prior to January 1, 2022, the member's accumulated
contributions; or
(b) For members who began participating in the system on or after January 1, 2022, the combined sum of
the member's accumulated contributions and the member's accumulated employer contributions;
(31) "Foundational benefit component" means the benefits provided by KRS 161.220 to 161.716 to individuals who
become members on or after January 1, 2022, except for the supplemental benefit component and retiree
health benefits set forth in KRS 161.675; and
(32) "Supplemental benefit component" means:
(a) The benefit established pursuant to KRS 161.635 for individuals who become nonuniversity members
on or after January 1, 2022; or
(b) The benefit established pursuant to KRS 161.636 for individuals who become university members on or
after January 1, 2022.
Section 2. KRS 161.400 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) The board of trustees shall designate as actuary a competent person who shall be a fellow of the
Conference of Consulting Actuaries or a member of the American Academy of Actuaries. He or she
shall be the technical adviser of the board on matters regarding the operation of the funds of the system
and shall perform such other duties as are required in connection therewith.
(b) 1. At least once in each two (2) year period, the board shall cause an actuarial investigation to be
made of all of the economic experience under the retirement system, including but not limited to
the inflation rate, investment return, and payroll growth assumptions, relative to the economic
assumptions and funding methods previously adopted by the board.
2. At least once in each five (5) year period, the actuary shall make an actuarial investigation into
all of the demographic actuarial assumptions used, including but not limited to mortality tables,
withdrawal rates, and retirement rate assumptions, relative to the demographic actuarial
assumptions previously adopted by the board.
3. Each actuarial investigation shall include at a minimum a summary of the changes in actuarial
assumptions and funding methods recommended in the investigation and the projected impact of
the recommended changes on funding levels, unfunded liabilities, and actuarially recommended
contribution rates for employers over a thirty (30) year period.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

6 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(c) At least annually the actuary shall make an actuarial valuation of the retirement system. The valuation
shall include:
1. A description of the actuarial assumptions used, and the assumptions shall be reasonably related
to the experience of the system and represent the actuary's best estimate of anticipated
experience;
2. A description of any funding methods utilized or required by state law in the development of the
actuarial valuation results;
3. A description of any changes in actuarial assumptions and methods from the previous year's
actuarial valuation;
4. The actuarially recommended contribution rate for employers for the upcoming budget periods;
5. A thirty (30) year projection of the funding levels, unfunded liabilities, and actuarially
recommended contribution rates for employers based upon the actuarial assumptions, funding
methods, and experience of the system as of the valuation date;[ and]
6. A sensitivity analysis that evaluates the impact of changes in system assumptions, including but
not limited to the investment return assumption, payroll growth assumption, and medical
inflation rates, on employer contribution rates, funding levels, and unfunded liabilities; and
7. A breakdown of each individual employer's share of the actuarially accrued liability as
determined solely by the system's consulting actuary and assigned to each employer based
upon the last participating employer of the member or annuitant as of the valuation date. The
breakdown shall include a value for each individual employer, including but not limited to
each individual school district, each university, each state agency, and every other individual
employer who participates in the system.
(d) On the basis of the results of the valuations, the board of trustees shall make necessary changes in the
retirement system within the provisions of law and shall establish the contributions payable by
employers and the state specified in KRS 161.550, including changes prescribed by KRS 161.633,
161.634, 161.635, and 161.636, as applicable.
(e) For any change in actuarial assumptions, funding methods, retiree health insurance premiums and
subsidies, or any other decisions made by the board that impact system liabilities and actuarially
recommended contribution rates for employers and that are not made in conjunction with the actuarial
investigations required by paragraph (b) of this subsection, an actuarial analysis shall be completed
showing the projected impact of the changes on funding levels, unfunded liabilities, and actuarially
recommended contribution rates for employers over a thirty (30) year period.
(2) Actuarial factors and actuarial cost factor tables in use by the retirement system for all purposes shall be
determined by the actuary of the retirement system and approved by the board of trustees by resolution and
implemented without the necessity of an administrative regulation.
(3) A copy of each actuarial investigation, actuarial analysis, and valuation required by subsection (1) of this
section shall be forwarded electronically to the Legislative Research Commission no later than ten (10) days
after receipt by the board, and the Legislative Research Commission shall distribute the information received
to the committee staff and co-chairs of any committee that has jurisdiction over the Teachers' Retirement
System. The actuarial valuation required by subsection (1)(c) of this section shall be submitted no later than
November 15 following the close of the fiscal year.
Signed by Governor March 24, 2025.